Arkansas, session 2025, HB1010.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-154. Reimbursement rate for maternal health services.
(a) The Arkansas Medicaid Program shall:
(1) Set the reimbursement rate for maternal health services to
at least one hundred percent (100%) of the Medicare reimbursement rate for
the comparable service; and
(2) Reimburse for any maternal health service that is offered or
provided in the surrounding states.
(b) The Department of Human Services shall apply for any federal
waiver, Medicaid state plan amendment, or other authorization necessary to
implement this section.

/s/A. Collins


*JMB068*
01-23-2025 09:47:16 JMB068